Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1902
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Adulterated shall apply to any livestock product or poultry product under one or more of the following circumstances:

(a) If it fails to conform to the requirements established by the Nebraska Pure Food Act;

(b) If it has been subjected to radiation, unless the use of the radiation was in conformity with a regulation or exemption in effect pursuant to section 409 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act approved June 25, 1938, (52 Stat. 1040) and acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto; or

(c) If it is margarine containing animal fat and any of the raw material used therein consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance;

(2) Animal share means an ownership interest in an animal or herd of animals created by a written contract between an informed end consumer and a farmer or rancher that includes a bill of sale to the consumer for an ownership interest in the animal or herd and a boarding provision under which the consumer boards the animal or herd with the farmer or rancher for care and processing and the consumer is entitled to receive a share of meat from the animal or herd;

(3) Capable of use as human food shall apply to any wholesome livestock or poultry carcass or part or product of any such carcass, unless it is denatured or otherwise identified as required by rules and regulations prescribed by the director to preclude its use as human food or it is naturally inedible by humans;

(4) Container or package shall mean any box, can, tin, cloth, plastic, or other receptacle, wrapper, or cover;

(5) Department shall mean the Department of Agriculture;

(6) Director shall mean the Director of Agriculture;

(7) Establishment shall mean any building or structure in which slaughtering, butchering, meat canning, meat packing, meat manufacturing, poultry canning, poultry packing, poultry manufacturing, pet feed manufacturing, or rendering is carried on and the ground upon which such building or structure is erected and so much ground adjacent thereto as is used in carrying on the business of such establishment, including drains, gutters, and cesspools used in connection with the establishment and any place, including where a mobile or remote processing unit is located, or vehicle where livestock, poultry, livestock products, poultry products, meat food products, or poultry food products are prepared, manufactured, stored, sold, offered for sale, or exposed for sale. Establishment does not include operations under federal inspection;

(8) Federal Meat Inspection Act shall mean the act so entitled approved March 4, 1907, (34 Stat. 1260) as amended by the Wholesome Meat Act (81 Stat. 584), federal Poultry Products Inspection Act shall mean the act so entitled approved August 28, 1957, (71 Stat. 441) as amended by the Wholesome Poultry Products Act (82 Stat. 791), and federal acts shall mean the Federal Meat Inspection Act and the federal Poultry Products Inspection Act;

(9) Hydrolyzed whole poultry shall mean the animal feed product resulting from the hydrolyzation of whole carcasses of culled or dead, undecomposed poultry as such product is defined in the Official Publication of the Association of American Feed Control Officials;

(10) Immediate container shall mean any consumer package or any other container in which livestock products or poultry products which are not consumer-packaged are packed;

(11) Inspector shall mean an employee or official or agent of the State of Nebraska authorized by the director, or any employee or official of the federal government or any governmental subdivision of this state authorized by the director, to perform any inspection functions under the Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law under an agreement between the director and any governmental subdivision or other governmental agency;

(12) Intrastate commerce shall mean commerce within this state;

(13) Label shall mean a display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon any article or the immediate container, not including package liners, of any article;

(14) Labeling shall mean all labels and other written, printed, or graphic matter (a) upon any article or any of its containers or wrappers or (b) accompanying such article;

(15) License shall mean a license issued under the Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law by the director;

(16) Licensed establishment shall mean any of the establishments as defined in this section which are licensed under the terms of the Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law or pursuant to the terms of any other act administered by the director;

(17) Livestock shall mean any cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, mules, other equines, and other mammalian species as the director may determine, either living or dead;

(18) Livestock product shall mean any carcass, part thereof, meat, or meat food product of any livestock;

(19) Meat food product shall mean any product capable of use as human food which is made wholly or in part from any meat or other portion of the carcass of any cattle, sheep, swine, or goats, except products which contain meat or other portions of such carcasses only in a relatively small proportion or historically have not been considered by consumers as products of the meat food industry and which are exempt from definition as a meat food product by the director under such conditions as the director may prescribe to assure that the meat or other portions of such carcass contained in such product are not adulterated and that such products are not represented as meat food products. This term as applied to food products of equines or other mammalian species as designated by the director shall have a meaning comparable to that provided in this subdivision with respect to cattle, sheep, swine, and goats;

(20) Misbranded shall apply to any livestock product or poultry product under one or more of the following circumstances:

(a) If it fails to conform to the requirements established by the Nebraska Pure Food Act; or

(b) If it fails to bear directly thereon and on its containers, as the director may by rule and regulation prescribe, the official inspection legend and establishment number of the establishment where the product was prepared and, unrestricted by any of the foregoing, such other information as the director may require in such rules and regulations to assure that it will not have false or misleading labeling and that the public will be informed of the manner of handling required to maintain the article in a wholesome condition. Exemptions as to livestock products not in containers may be established by rules and regulations prescribed by the director and exemptions as to small packages may be established for livestock products or poultry products in the same manner;

(21) Mobile or remote processing unit shall mean any equipment for processing whole poultry by grinding, chopping, or other comparable method that is, or is intended to be, transported to or permanently located at locations away from a rendering establishment for purposes of collecting poultry carcasses processed for transport to a rendering establishment in liquid suspension;

(22) Official certificate shall mean any certificate prescribed by rules and regulations of the director for issuance by an inspector or other person performing official functions under the Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law;

(23) Official device shall mean any device prescribed or authorized by the director for use in applying any official mark;

(24) Official establishment shall mean any establishment as determined by the director at which antemortem and postmortem inspection of livestock or poultry or the inspection of the manufacturing of livestock products or poultry products for human consumption is maintained under the authority of the Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law;

(25) Official inspection legend shall mean any symbol prescribed by rules and regulations of the director showing that an article was inspected and passed in accordance with the Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law;

(26) Official mark shall mean the official inspection legend or any other symbol prescribed by regulations of the director to identify the status of any article, livestock, or poultry under the Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law;

(27) Person shall include individuals, partnerships, limited liability companies, corporations, and associations and any officer, agent, partner, limited liability company member, or employee thereof;

(28) Pesticide chemical, food additive, color additive, and raw agricultural commodity shall have the same meanings for purposes of the Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law as under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act approved June 25, 1938, (52 Stat. 1040);

(29) Pet feed manufacturing shall mean the business of processing livestock or poultry or carcasses or parts thereof into small animal feed;

(30) Poultry shall mean any domesticated bird or other avian species as the director may designate, either living or dead;

(31) Poultry product shall mean any poultry carcass or part thereof or any product which is made wholly or in part from any poultry carcass or part thereof, except products which contain poultry ingredients only in a relatively small proportion or historically have not been considered by consumers as products of the poultry food industry and which are exempt by the director from definition as a poultry product under such conditions as the director may prescribe to assure that the poultry ingredients in such products are not adulterated and that such products are not represented as poultry products;

(32) Prepared shall mean slaughtered, canned, salted, stuffed, rendered, boned, cut up, frozen, or otherwise manufactured or processed in any manner;

(33) Reinspection shall include inspection of the preparation of livestock products and poultry products, as well as reexamination of articles previously inspected;

(34) Rendering shall mean the business of processing livestock or poultry or carcasses or parts thereof not intended or capable for use as human food, including the processing of poultry carcasses into hydrolyzed whole poultry feed products; and

(35) Shipping container shall mean any container used or intended for use in packaging the product packed in an immediate container.

Laws 1969, c. 449, § 2, p. 1502;

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 42;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 5;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 346;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 73;

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 160, § 12;

Laws 2021, LB324, § 2.

Nebraska Pure Food Act, see section 81-2,239.